Maryland, session 2026, HB1104.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
1–1320.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Administration” means the Maryland Energy Administration.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1104*

HOUSE BILL 1104
(3) “Residential energy storage system” means a system, on a residential
customer’s side of the meter, used to store electrical energy, or mechanical, chemical, or
thermal energy that was once electrical energy, for use as electrical energy at a later date
or in a process that offsets electricity use at peak times.
(4) “Residential solar energy system” means any configuration of solar
energy devices that collects and distributes solar energy for the purpose of generating
electricity and that has a single residential interconnection with the electrical grid.
(5) “SOLAR PERMITTING FEE” MEANS A FEE EQUAL TO THE SUM OF
ALL CHARGES IMPOSED BY A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY, INCLUDING CHARGES
IMPOSED BY A PROVIDER OF SOLAR PERMITTING SOFTWARE, IN CONNECTION WITH
AN APPLICATION FOR A RESIDENTIAL SOLAR ENERGY SYSTEM.
(6) “Solar permitting software” means[:
(i) the most recent version of a web–based platform, developed by
the National Renewable Energy Laboratory, that provides a standard portal for receiving
and processing residential solar energy system and residential energy storage system
permit information; or
(ii) automated software that functions to support the tracking and
approval of residential building permits for residential solar energy systems, residential
energy storage systems, main electrical panel upgrades, and main electrical panel devices]
SOFTWARE OR A COMBINATION OF SOFTWARE THAT:
(I) AUTOMATES PLAN REVIEW FOR RESIDENTIAL SOLAR
ENERGY SYSTEMS TO THE MOST RECENT VERSION OF THE MARYLAND BUILDING
PERFORMANCE STANDARDS, ELECTRICAL CODE, AND FIRE PREVENTION CODE, AS
APPLICABLE;
(II) PRODUCES CODE–COMPLIANT APPROVALS;
(III) ISSUES A CODE–COMPLIANT PERMIT;
(IV) ACCEPTS ONLINE PAYMENTS FOR ANY PERMITTING FEES
IMPOSED; AND
(V) ISSUES PERMITS OR PERMIT REVISIONS IMMEDIATELY ON
RECEIPT OF ONLINE SUBMISSION OF PERMITTING FEE PAYMENTS, IF APPLICABLE.
(b) This section applies to all counties and municipalities.

HOUSE BILL 1104 3
(c) (1) Subject to subsection [(d)] (E) of this section and except as provided in
subsection [(e)] (F) of this section, on or before August 1, [2025] 2027, each county and
municipality shall implement solar permitting software for features supporting the
tracking and approval of residential building permits for:
[(1)] (I) residential solar energy systems;
[(2)] (II) residential energy storage systems;
[(3)] (III) main electrical panel upgrades; and
[(4)] (IV) main electrical panel derates.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D)(1) OF THIS SECTION, ON OR
BEFORE AUGUST 1, 2027, EACH COUNTY AND MUNICIPALITY SHALL AUTHORIZE ANY
INSPECTION REQUIRED FOR A PROJECT PERMITTED BY SOLAR PERMITTING
SOFTWARE TO BE CONDUCTED REMOTELY THROUGH:
1. RECORDED VIDEO; OR
2. PHOTOGRAPH.
(II) A REMOTE INSPECTION CONDUCTED UNDER THIS
PARAGRAPH:
1. MAY NOT COST EXCEED $100; AND
2. SHALL BE COMPLETED WITHIN THE SAME TIME
FRAME AS AN IN–PERSON INSPECTION.
(III) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY MAY NOT REQUIRE REMOTE
INSPECTIONS CONDUCTED UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH TO BE CONDUCTED MORE THAN
ONCE UNLESS THE FIRST INSPECTION RESULTED IN A FAILED INSPECTION.
(3) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY MAY NOT REQUIRE MANUAL REVIEW
AT ANY TIME DURING THE PERMITTING AND INSPECTION PROCESS FOR PERMITS
APPROVED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(4) BEGINNING AUGUST 1, 2027, A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY MAY
NOT SET A SOLAR PERMITTING FEE THAT EXCEEDS $200 FOR RESIDENTIAL SOLAR
ENERGY SYSTEMS.
(5) AN INSPECTOR MAY REVIEW CONSTRUCTION DOCUMENTS THAT
ARE PRODUCED BY THE SOLAR PERMITTING SOFTWARE.

HOUSE BILL 1104
(D) REVIEW OF A PERMIT APPLICATION TO INSTALL A RESIDENTIAL SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM SHALL BE LIMITED TO A DETERMINATION WHETHER
THE APPLICATION MEETS ALL HEALTH AND SAFETY REQUIREMENTS UNDER STATE
AND LOCAL LAW.
[(d)] (E) A county or municipality may not be required to comply with the
requirements of subsection (c) of this section if:
(1) the county or municipality does not require a permit for:
(i) residential solar energy systems; or
(ii) residential solar energy systems paired with a residential solar
energy storage system; or
(2) as determined by the Administration, the automated software is no
longer updated or maintained.
[(e)] (F) The Administration shall delay the initial implementation or suspend
the requirements of subsection (c) of this section if there are insufficient State or federal
funds available to the Administration to provide financial support to a county or
municipality implementing solar permitting software as defined in subsection (a)(5)(i) of
this section.
(G) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY SEEK JUDICIAL ENFORCEMENT AGAINST
A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY THAT FAILS TO COMPLY WITH THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.